Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-228
County fair board; report.

If the county fair board is appointed by the county board, the county fair board shall report in writing to the county board as directed by the county board showing a complete statement and report of its actions. The report shall be kept in the office of the county clerk and shall be open to public inspection.

Laws 1917, c. 168, § 9, p. 379;

C.S.1922, § 65;

C.S.1929, § 2-218;

R.S.1943, § 2-228;

Laws 1999, LB 437, § 8.